Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2407
Vehicle;
full possession of towing vehicle; when; effect.

Anyone attempting
to tow away a vehicle
pursuant to sections 60-2401 to 60-2411 shall not be in full possession of
the vehicle
to be towed until the vehicle
has been fully and completely attached to his or her towing vehicle. The tower
shall, upon request of the owner or driver of the vehicle to be towed, disengage the towing
apparatus at any time prior to taking full possession, as defined in this
section, of the vehicle.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 7.